District of Columbia statutes.
8-2131.04

Prima facie evidence of a public health nuisance.

The presence of vectors in their developmental stages on a property, or in a vessel, container, or other structure on a property, shall be prima facie evidence of a public health nuisance.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-163, § 5, 51 DCR 3683